Hawaii statutes.
[§321-542] Definitions. As used
in this part:

"Consumer" means a health care
facility, health care professional, or health care provider, as defined in
section 432E-1, or any individual who is prescribed durable medical equipment
as the result of medical necessity.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Durable medical equipment" means
equipment that is considered a selected product under the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and
supplies competitive bidding program that can stand repeated use; is primarily
and customarily used to serve a medical purpose; is generally not useful to a
person in the absence of an illness or injury; is appropriate for use in the
home; does not contain any prescription drug; and is not considered to be a
specialty item, equipment, or service.

"Durable medical equipment supplier"
means a person who sells, dispenses, delivers, or services durable medical
equipment. [L 2016, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next